District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-308.01

Grounds for rendition.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 801, 42 DCR 6748
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-348.1.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 801 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).